Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-246
Automatic dialing-announcing device; certain use prohibited.

A person shall not use an automatic dialing-announcing device in such a way that two or more telephone lines of a business with a multiline telephone system are engaged simultaneously.

Laws 1993, LB 305, § 10;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1210;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 108.